Utah statutes.
Section 5.  Section 77-16b-105 is enacted to read:

77-16b-105.   Involuntary feeding or hydration of prisoners -- Exceptions.

This chapter does not apply to medically imposed fasts for the purpose of conducting medical procedures or tests, or to religious fasts of reasonable duration.

Enacted by Chapter 355, 2012 General Session

